Mississippi, session 2026, HB1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-33-52, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-52.  (1)  A bingo game may be conducted only: (a)  When held for the benefit of a charitable organization that (i) is licensed pursuant to Section 97-33-55 or Section 97-33-59; (ii) is domiciled in the State of Mississippi; and (b)  When the game is held by active members of such organization. (2)  Except as may be otherwise provided in Sections 97-33-51 through 97-33-203, * * *all no more than sixty-five (65%) percent net proceeds derived from a bingo game * * *authorized by this section shall be expended only is required to be spent for the purposes for which the organization is created, and no less than thirty-five percent (35%) net proceeds derived from a bingo game may be spent on administrative costs of the organization or as authorized by this section shall be distributed to a charity outside of the State of Mississippi without the approval of the Mississippi Gaming Commission.  Nothing in the Charitable Bingo Law shall prohibit a charitable organization from using gross receipts derived from a bingo game conducted under the Charitable Bingo Law to pay administrative penalties imposed by any state agency against the charitable organization. (3)  None of the proceeds of a bingo game authorized to be held under this section shall be used to purchase, construct or improve a building, hall or other facility solely for the purpose of conducting or operating a bingo game. (4)  Every organization which conducts bingo games shall report to the Mississippi Gaming Commission at such time, in such manner and on such forms as the commission prescribes.  All records and reports so filed shall be public records and shall be available for inspection in accordance with the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.